Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-318.
Soliciting to engage in illicit sexual relations; penalty.

Except under circumstances constituting sexual assault in the first, second or third degree as defined by W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

, or sexual abuse of a minor in the first, second, third or fourth degree as defined by W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

, anyone who has reached the age of majority and who solicits, procures or knowingly encourages anyone less than the age of fourteen (14) years, or a person purported to be less than the age of fourteen (14) years, to engage in sexual intrusion as defined in W.S.

6-2-301

is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be imprisoned for a term of not more than five (5) years.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

“Solicit” not unconstitutionally vague. —

Court rejected defendant's claim that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-3-104

(repealed), the statute under which he was convicted on two alternative theories of soliciting or knowingly encouraging a person under the age of 16 to engage in illicit sexual intrusion, violates due process guaranteed by the U.S. Const. amend. XIV and Wyo. Const. art. I, § 6 because it is unconstitutionally vague in that it does not define the term “solicit” or provide fair notice of the prohibited conduct. Defendant failed to sufficiently brief the issue by presenting pertinent authority and cogent argument in favor of his position; the term “solicit” is used in numerous Wyoming statutes without being separately defined; and the plain meaning of the term is clear from its dictionary definitions and is routinely used by other jurisdictions. Blakeman v. State, 2004 WY 139, 100 P.3d 1229,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 2004) (decided under prior law).

Meaning of “procure” not restricted. —

There is no indication that the legislature intended to restrict the word “procure” to any one of its meanings. Stambaugh v. State, 613 P.2d 1237,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Omission of victims' names error. —

Omission of the victims' names from the criminal complaint, the criminal warrant and the information, rendered the documents fatally defective, deprived the lower courts of jurisdiction and warranted reversal of conviction. Walker v. State, 847 P.2d 542,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. Mar. 16, 1993) (decided under prior law).

Legal impossibility is not a defense to attempt. —

Defendant did not show plain error under W.R.Cr.P. 52(b) based on prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutor did not inform the trial court that two counts in the information did not constitute crimes. Although defendant did not, in fact, solicit a “minor” because an undercover agent was posing as the minor, defendant could have been prosecuted for attempted solicitation of a minor under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

14-3-104

(repealed) and 6-1-301(a)(ii). Legal impossibility is not a defense to attempt. Rutti v. State, 2004 WY 133, 100 P.3d 394,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 215

(Wyo. Dec. 14, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1019, 125 S. Ct. 1990, 161 L. Ed. 2d 858, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3781 (U.S. 2005) (decided under prior law).

Actual victim not required for conviction of attempt to engagein illicit sexual relations with a minor. —

Where defendant engaged in conversation with an undercover detective in an internet chatroom and agreed to meet the person in an agreed-upon location for sexual activity, convictions for attempted sexual exploitation of a child and attempted solicitation to engage in illicit sexual relations in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 6-4-303(b)(ii) and

14-3-104

(repealed) were upheld; the State was not required to produce an actual child victim for crimes of attempt. Adams v. State, 2005 WY 94, 117 P.3d 1210,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2005) (decided under prior law).

Applied

in

In re Adoption of RHA, 702 P.2d 1259,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 516

(Wyo. 1985); Campbell v. State, 709 P.2d 425,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 608

(Wyo. 1985) (decided under prior law).

Stated

in

Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995) (decided under prior law).

Cited

in

State in Interest of C., 638 P.2d 165,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 410

(Wyo. 1981); Auclair v. State, 660 P.2d 1156,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 298

(Wyo. 1983); Reagan v. State, 14 P.3d 925,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 232

(Wyo. 2000); White v. State, 2003 WY 163, 80 P.3d 642,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2003) (decided under prior law).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Standard of proof required under statute providing for commitment of sexual offenders or sexual psychopaths, 96 ALR3d 840.

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's age as defense to statutory rape, 46 ALR5th 499.

§ 6-2-319.
Names not to be released; restrictions on disclosures or publication of information; violations; penalties.

Prior to the filing of an information or indictment in district court charging a violation of an offense under this article, neither the names of the alleged actor or the victim of the charged offense nor any other information reasonably likely to disclose the identities of the parties shall be released or negligently allowed to be released to the public by any public employee except as authorized by the judge with jurisdiction over the criminal charges. The actor’s name may be released to the public to aid or facilitate an arrest. This subsection shall not apply if release of the name or information is necessary to enforce an order for protection against the alleged actor.

After the filing of an information or indictment in district court and absent a request to release the identity of a minor victim by the minor or another acting on behalf of a minor victim, the trial court shall, to the extent necessary to protect the welfare of the minor victim, restrict the disclosure of the name of the minor victim, unless the name has been publicly disclosed by the parent or legal guardian of the minor or by law enforcement in an effort to find the victim. The trial court may, to the extent necessary to protect the welfare of the minor victim, restrict disclosure of the information reasonably likely to identify the minor victim.

Any person who willfully violates subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or be imprisoned in the county jail not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

A release of a name or other information to the public in violation of the proscriptions of this section shall not stand as a bar to the prosecution of a defendant nor be grounds for dismissal of any charges against a defendant.

As used in this section “minor victim” means a person less than the age of eighteen (18) years.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1; 2009, ch. 18, § 1; 2015 ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a), substituted “an offense under this article” for “W.S.

6-2-314

through

6-2-318

,” “alleged actor” for “person accused” and “actor's name” for “name of the person accused”; and inserted “and absent a request to release the identity of a minor victim by the minor or another acting on behalf of a minor victim” in (b).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “identities of the parties” for “identity of the victim,” and added the last sentence.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Open proceedings.

Circuit court
violated the First Amendment when it closed the proceedings in a juvenile
sexual assault case and sealed the court records purportedly in accordance
with this section. Circuit Court of the Eighth Judicial Dist. v. Lee Newspapers, 2014 WY 101, 332 P.3d 523,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2014).

Proceedings
in sexual assault cases, like judicial documents, must generally remain
open to the public. To avoid revealing the name of the defendant during
a hearing, the circuit court judge or magistrate may use initials
in the place of the name when required to name the defendant in open
court. Circuit Court of the Eighth Judicial Dist. v. Lee Newspapers, 2014 WY 101, 332 P.3d 523,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 6-2-320.
Prohibited access to school facilities by adult sex offenders; exceptions; penalties; definitions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

shall:

Be upon or remain on the premises of any school building or school grounds in this state, or upon other properties owned or leased by a school when the registered offender has reason to believe children under the age of eighteen (18) years are present and are involved in a school activity or when children are present within thirty (30) minutes before or after a scheduled school activity;

Knowingly loiter on a public way within one thousand (1,000) feet from the property line of school grounds in this state, including other properties owned or leased by a school when children under the age of eighteen (18) years are present and are involved in a school activity or when children are present within thirty (30) minutes before or after a scheduled school activity;

Be in any vehicle owned or leased by a school to transport students to or from school or a school related activity when children under the age of eighteen (18) years are present in the vehicle;

Reside within one thousand (1,000) feet of the property on which a school is located, measured from the nearest point of the exterior wall of the registered offender’s dwelling unit to the school’s property line, except that this paragraph shall not apply if the registered offender’s residence was established prior to July 1, 2010.

The provisions of paragraphs (a)(i) and (ii) shall not apply to the extent the registered offender:

Is a student in attendance at the school;

With the written permission of the school principal, vice-principal or person with equivalent authority, is attending an academic conference or other scheduled extracurricular school event with school officials present when the registered offender is a parent or legal guardian of a child who is participating in the conference or extracurricular event;

Resides at a state licensed or certified facility for incarceration, health or convalescent care that is within one thousand (1,000) feet from the property on which a school is located;

Is dropping off or picking up a child and the registered offender is the child’s parent or legal guardian;

Is temporarily on school grounds during school hours for the purpose of making a mail, food or other delivery;

Is exercising his right to vote in a public election;

Is taking delivery of his mail through an official post office located on school grounds;

Has written permission from the school principal, vice-principal, or person with equivalent authority, to be on the school grounds or upon other property that is used by a school; or

Stays at a homeless shelter or resides at a recovery facility that is within one thousand (1,000) feet from the property on which a school is located if such shelter or facility has been approved for sex offenders by the sheriff or police chief.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Nothing in this section shall prevent a school district from adopting more stringent safety and security requirements for employees and nonemployees while they are in district facilities or on district properties.

As used in this section:

“Extracurricular event” means any school sponsored activity that is outside the regular curriculum, occurring during or outside regular school hours, including academic, artistic, athletic or recreational activities;

“Registered offender” means a person who is eighteen (18) years of age or older who is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to W.S.

7-19-302

.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 87, § 1; 2020 ch. 151, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 87, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(ii), added “With the written permission of the school principal, vice-principal or person with equivalent authority” at the beginning.